Georgia, session 2025_26, HB465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 3 of Title 35 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Georgia
Bureau of Investigation, is amended by revising Article 7, relating to state-wide alert system
for missing disabled adults, as follows:
"ARTICLE 7
35-3-170.
This article shall be known and may be cited as the 'Mattie's Call Act.'
H. B. 465 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 56 0331S
35-3-171.
As used in this article, the term:
(1) 'Alert system' means the state-wide 'Mattie's Call' alert system for missing disabled
adults, and medically endangered persons, and persons with autism spectrum disorder.
(2) 'Autism spectrum disorder' means a developmental disorder characterized by
difficulties with social interaction, communication challenges, and restricted or repetitive
patterns of behavior.
(2)(3) 'Disabled adult' means an adult who is developmentally impaired or who suffers
from dementia or some other cognitive impairment.
(3)(4) 'Local law enforcement agency' means a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction
over the investigation of a missing disabled adult or other medically endangered person.
(4)(5) 'Medically endangered person' means a person with a known medical condition
that might reasonably cause such person to become incapacitated or that may result in
life-threatening physiological conditions likely to lead to serious bodily injury or death
if not immediately treated.
35-3-172.
(a) With the cooperation of the office of the Governor, the Georgia Lottery Corporation,
and other appropriate law enforcement agencies in this state, the bureau shall develop and
implement a state-wide alert system to be activated on behalf of missing disabled adults,
and medically endangered persons, and persons with autism spectrum disorder.
(b) Activation of a state-wide missing person alert system shall not prevent or prohibit any
other state or local law enforcement agency from taking additional measures in response
to the receipt of a missing person report.
35-3-173.
(a) The director is the state-wide coordinator of the alert system.
H. B. 465 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 56 0331S
(b) The director shall adopt rules and issue directives as necessary to ensure proper
implementation of the alert system. The rules and directives shall include instructions on
the procedures for activating and deactivating the alert system.
(c) The director shall prescribe forms for use by local law enforcement agencies in
requesting activation of the alert system.
(d) No rule or directive adopted by the director shall mandate a minimum waiting period
before the alert system may be activated or a request by local law enforcement agencies
may be submitted to the bureau; provided, however, that it shall remain within the
discretion of the director, as provided in this article, whether the alert system shall be
activated at the request of a local law enforcement agency.
(e) When making a determination whether to activate or whether to request the activation
of a state-wide missing person alert system, both the director and the requesting local law
enforcement agency shall take into consideration the known medical condition of the
missing person if the medical condition may reasonably be considered a cause for the
inability to locate such missing person. In so considering the medical condition of a
missing person, particularly if such condition may be immediately life-threatening or
incapacitating, the director or other authorized person and the requesting law enforcement
official shall be authorized, within his or her discretion, to initiate and request, respectively,
a state-wide endangered person advisory.
35-3-174.
The staff of personal care homes and assisted living communities shall call the local police
department to report the elopement of any disabled person adult, medically endangered
person, or person with autism spectrum disorder from the home within 30 minutes of the
staff's receiving actual knowledge that such person is missing from the home.
H. B. 465 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 56 0331S
35-3-175.
(a) The bureau shall recruit public and commercial television, radio, cable, print, and other
media, private commercial entities, state or local governmental entities, the public, and
other appropriate persons to assist in developing and implementing the alert system.
(b) The bureau may enter into agreements with participants in the alert system to provide
necessary support for the alert system.
35-3-176.
(a) On notification by a local law enforcement agency that a disabled adult, or medically
endangered person, or person with autism spectrum disorder is missing, the director shall
activate the alert system and notify appropriate participants in the alert system, as
established by rule, if:
(1) A local law enforcement agency believes that a disabled adult, or medically
endangered person, or person with autism spectrum disorder is missing;
(2) A local law enforcement agency believes that the disabled adult, or medically
endangered person, or person with autism spectrum disorder is in immediate danger of
serious bodily injury or death;
(3) A local law enforcement agency confirms that an investigation has taken place that
verifies the disappearance and eliminates alternative explanations for the disabled adult's
or medically endangered person's disappearance of the disabled adult, medically
endangered person, or person with autism spectrum disorder; and
(4) Sufficient information is available to disseminate to the public that could assist in
locating the disabled adult, or medically endangered person, or person with autism
spectrum disorder.
(b) The area of the alert may be less than state wide if the director determines that the
nature of the event makes it probable that the disabled adult, or medically endangered
H. B. 465 (SUB)
- 4 -

LC 56 0331S
person, or person with autism spectrum disorder did not leave a certain geographic
location.
(c) The bureau may modify the criteria described by subsection (a) of this Code section
as necessary for the proper implementation of the alert system.
35-3-177.
Before requesting activation of the alert system, a law enforcement agency shall verify that
the criteria described by subsection (a) of Code Section 35-3-176 have been satisfied. The
law enforcement agency shall assess the appropriate boundaries of the alert, based on the
nature of the disabled adult, or medically endangered person, or person with autism
spectrum disorder and the circumstances surrounding the disappearance. On verification
of the criteria, the law enforcement agency shall immediately contact the bureau to request
100 activation and shall supply the necessary information on the forms prescribed by the
101 director.
102 35-3-178.
103 (a) A state agency participating in the alert system shall:
104 (1) Cooperate with the bureau and assist in developing and implementing the alert
105 system;
106 (2) Establish a plan for providing relevant information to its officers, investigators, or
107 employees, as appropriate, once the alert system has been activated; and
108 (3) Utilize a rapid response telephone system that alerts residents in a targeted area.
109 (b) The Georgia Lottery Corporation is directed to develop a method of notifying its
110 vendors within an alert area of an alert in a manner designed to disseminate alert
111 information to customers at its retail locations.
112 (c) Any activation of the alert system for a missing person with autism spectrum disorder
113 pursuant to this article shall:
H. B. 465 (SUB)
- 5 -

LC 56 0331S
114 (1) Issue guidance to local law enforcement agencies engaged in a search for the missing
115 person to prioritize waterways, including lakes, rivers, pools, ditches, and other potential
116 water sources;
117 (2) Advise the public to check roadways for any sign of the missing person;
118 (3) Describe the missing person as clearly as possible;
119 (4) Provide a last known location for the missing person; and
120 (5) Provide any information on the distinctive behaviors associated with autism spectrum
121 disorder that may assist in identifying the missing person.
122 35-3-179.
123 The director shall terminate any activation of the alert system with respect to a particular
124 disabled adult, or medically endangered person, or person with autism spectrum disorder
125 if:
126 (1) The person is located or the disappearance is otherwise resolved; or
127 (2) The director determines that the alert system is no longer an effective tool for
128 locating and recovering the disabled adult, or medically endangered person, or person
129 with autism spectrum disorder.
130 35-3-180.
131 (a) Any entity or individual participating in the 'Mattie's call' alert system pursuant to this
132 article shall not be liable for any civil damages arising from the dissemination of any alert
133 generated pursuant to the 'Mattie's call' alert system.
134 (b) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit or restrict in any way any legal
135 protection an individual or entity may have under any other law for disseminating any
136 information."
H. B. 465 (SUB)
- 6 -

LC 56 0331S
137 SECTION 2.
138 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 465 (SUB)
- 7 -